Washington statutes.
RCW 43.41.423

Extended student financial aid—Reports on impact.

The education research and data center shall report to the legislature by December 1, 2024, and each year thereafter, on the impacts of chapter 323, Laws of 2024 on degree completion outcomes, including any increase in the number of students utilizing the extended eligibility provided under chapter 323, Laws of 2024.

[ 2024 c 323 s 6.]